Utah statutes.
63D-2-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Collect" means the gathering of personally identifiable information:
(i)  from a user of a governmental website; or
(ii)  about a user of the governmental website.
(b)  "Collect" includes use of any identifying code linked to a user of a
governmental website.
(2)  "Court website" means a website on the Internet that is operated by or on
behalf of any court created in Title 78A, Chapter 1, Judiciary.
(3)  "Governmental entity" means:
(a)  an executive branch agency as defined in Section 63F-1-102;
(b)  the legislative branch;
(c)  the judicial branch;
(d)  the State Board of Education;
(e)  the Board of Regents;
(f)  an institution of higher education; and
(g)  a political subdivision of the state:
(i)  as defined in Section 17B-1-102; and
(ii)  including a school district.
(4) (a)  "Governmental website" means a website on the Internet that is
operated by or on behalf of a governmental entity.
(b)  "Governmental website" includes a court website.
(5)  "Governmental website operator" means a governmental entity or person
acting on behalf of the governmental entity that:
(a)  operates a governmental website; and
(b)  collects or maintains personally identifiable information from or about a
user of that website.
(6)  "Personally identifiable information" means information that identifies:
(a)  a user by:
(i)  name;
(ii)  account number;
(iii)  physical address;
(iv)  email address;
(v)  telephone number;
(vi)  Social Security number;
(vii)  credit card information; or
(viii)  bank account information;
(b)  a user as having requested or obtained specific materials or services
from a governmental website;
(c)  Internet sites visited by a user; or
(d)  any of the contents of a user's data-storage device.
(7)  "User" means a person who accesses a governmental website.
